Hawaii statutes.
[§195F-7] Penalty payback provisions.
The board shall establish and implement a penalty payback provision to be
applied in the event that a landowner terminates any approved practice required
under the forest stewardship management plan, as agreed to by the board and the
landowner. [L 1991, c 327, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next